Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 3. Supervisory Union Treasury; Treasurer; Audits

§ 321.
Treasury; uses.

A supervisory union shall have a treasury for the purpose of transacting the financial affairs of the supervisory union and any joint operations among or within supervisory unions authorized under section 267 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1966, No. 59

(Sp. Sess.), § 1(a); amended

1987, No. 228

(Adj. Sess.), § 9.

§ 322.
Treasurer; salary; expenses; duties.

A supervisory union board shall elect a supervisory union treasurer at least annually, fix the salary and expenses, and determine the amount of a bond for him or her.

Nothing shall preclude a supervisory union treasurer from also being a treasurer or deputy treasurer for any school district within the supervisory union if so voted by the electors for the school treasurer. Before beginning duty, a deputy treasurer shall give a bond with corporate surety conditioned for the faithful performance of duties in the same amount and for the benefit of the same obligee as the bond required of the school treasurer.

It shall be the duty of the supervisory union treasurer to sign all checks and drafts, and invest in a prudent manner all funds in the supervisory union treasury as directed by the supervisory union board. Upon request by the supervisory union board, the supervisory union treasurer shall prepare a balance sheet. The supervisory union treasurer shall reconcile monthly accounts with the supervisory union bookkeeper.

HISTORY:

Added

1966, No. 59

(Sp. Sess.), § 1(b); amended

1967, No. 155

, § 1, eff. April 15, 1967;

1987, No. 228

(Adj. Sess.), § 10;

2003, No. 107

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 323.
Audit by public accountant.

Annually, the supervisory union board shall employ one or more public accountants to audit the financial statements of the supervisory union and its member districts. The audits shall be conducted in accordance with generally accepted government auditing standards, including the issuance of a report of internal controls over financial reporting to be provided to recipients of the financial statements. Any annual report of the supervisory union to member districts shall include notice that the audits have been performed and the time and place where the full report of the public accountant will be available for inspection and for copying at cost.

HISTORY:

Added

1966, No. 59

(Sp. Sess.), § 1(c); amended

1987, No. 15

, § 2;

2009, No. 44

, § 3, eff. May 21, 2009;

2011, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 19, eff. July 1, 2013.

§ 324.
Term of office; vacancy.

The term of office of a supervisory union treasurer shall be for one year from July 1 through June 30. If the office becomes vacant, the voting members of the supervisory union board shall elect a new supervisory union treasurer to take office on election for the unexpired term.

HISTORY:

Added

1966, No. 59

(Sp. Sess.), § 1(d); amended

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 45, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 325.
Removal from office.

A supervisory union treasurer may be removed from office for cause by a majority vote of the members of the supervisory union board present and eligible to vote at a meeting called for that purpose.

HISTORY:

Added

1966, No. 59

(Sp. Sess.), § 1(e); amended

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 46, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.